Missouri, session 2026, HB2078.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 168, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 168.186, to read as follows:
168.186. 1. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Administrative staff", an employee of a school district who fulfills one or
more of the following:
(a) Maintains a primary job function in an administrative position that may
include supervisory authority;
(b) Is employed part time or full time for supervisory and administrative work;
(c) Maintains a job classification that is included on the school administrators'
position schedule of the school district for purposes of chapter 169;
(d) Provides services for which a school administrator's certification or other
certification beyond that required under section 168.021 is required by the school
district; or
(e) Maintains one or more of the following titles or another substantially similar
title:
a. Superintendent;
b. Assistant Superintendent;
c. Director;
d. Principal;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2078 2
e. Coordinator;
f. Assistant Principal;
g. Administrative Assistant; or
h. Administrator Liaison;
(2) "Teacher", an employee who:
(a) Possesses a certificate of license to teach in the public schools of this state
under chapter 168; and
(b) Is employed part time or full time by a school district to teach pupils who are
in preschool, kindergarten, or grade one to grade twelve during regularly scheduled
instructional time;
(3) "Total compensation", as calculated for the most recently completed full
school year, all amounts of any salary, wages, and fringe benefits provided by a school
district to administrative staff and teachers providing services in a classroom, as
applicable, except that "total compensation" shall not include any additional salary,
wages, or other monetary compensation provided by a school district to a school
district's teacher for service performed on behalf of a school district as a coach, advisor,
sponsor, or other similar service.
2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, beginning in the
2027-28 school year, the combined amount of the total compensation provided by a
school district to its administrative staff and teachers shall be distributed as follows:
(1) For the 2027-28 school year, at least eighty-eight percent of the total
compensation shall be expended on compensation of teachers; and
(2) For the 2028-29 school year and each subsequent year, the percentage
described in subdivision (1) of this section shall increase by at least one percentage point
each school year until the amount of total compensation expended on compensation of
teachers is at least ninety-five percent of the total compensation.
✔